Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE - NOT CODIFIED

TITLE 1. THE INSURANCE CODE OF 1951

CHAPTER 1. THE BOARD, ITS POWERS AND DUTIES

Art. 1.04D. DUTIES OF COMPTROLLER.

(a) Expired.

(b) The duties transferred to the comptroller relative to taxes, fees, and assessments imposed under this code or another insurance law of this state relate to the collection, reporting, enforcement, and administration of all such amounts currently provided for under this code or another insurance law of this state, and also of any taxes, fees, or assessments that have been repealed or are otherwise inactive but for which amounts may still be owing or refunds may be due on or after the effective date of this article.

(c) Expired.

(d) Expired.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 685, Sec. 3.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Subsec. (a) amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 101, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Subsecs. (a), (c), (d) repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 26(b)(1), eff. April 1, 2005.

Art. 1.09-1. REPRESENTED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL. (a) The department, the State Board of Insurance, and the Commissioner shall be represented and advised by the Attorney General in all legal matters before them or in which they shall be interested or concerned. The department, the Board, and the Commissioner may not employ or obtain any other legal services without the written approval of the Attorney General.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730, Sec. 1L.001(b), eff. April 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 1957, 55th Leg., p. 1454, ch. 499, Sec. 3.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 1, Sec. 1.03, eff. Sept. 2, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 242, Sec. 1.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Subsec. (b) amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 685, Sec. 1.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1L.001(b), eff. April 1, 2009.